Indiana, session 2026, HB1167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-19-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 14. Digital Alert Pilot Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "applicant" means any of the
following service providers:
(1) A city or town.
(2) A township.
(3) A fire protection territory.
(4) A fire protection district.
(5) A volunteer fire department.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "authorized emergency vehicle"
means an authorized emergency vehicle (as defined in IC 9-13-2-6)
of an applicant.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "digital alert technology" means
technology that is capable of automatically sending a digital alert:
(1) when an emergency vehicle's lights are activated; and
2026 IN 1167—LS 6740/DI 87


(2) to a motorist through:
(A) a navigational smartphone application; or
(B) an in-vehicle navigation system.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "fund" means the digital alert
pilot program grant fund established by section 11 of this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "pilot program" means the
digital alert pilot program established by section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "secretary" means the secretary
of the office of public safety, established by executive order of the
governor.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "service" means any of the
following services:
(1) Fire protection.
(2) Emergency medical.
(3) Law enforcement.
Sec. 8. The digital alert pilot program is established to provide
grants to eligible applicants for the use of digital alert technology
to reduce motorist collisions with authorized emergency vehicles
by providing notice to a motorist of the location of an authorized
emergency vehicle that is:
(1) en route to an emergency; or
(2) parked at an emergency scene, including in or alongside a
highway, street, or road.
Sec. 9. (a) The pilot program shall be administered by the
department.
(b) The department shall develop criteria regarding the
expenditures for which a grant may be awarded, including
expenditures for:
(1) the purchase or rental of dedicated transponders for
installation and use in authorized emergency vehicles; and
(2) the purchase of subscriptions to digital alerting platforms
and cloud storage.
Sec. 10. The department shall do the following:
(1) Prescribe the form and manner in which grant
applications may be submitted.
(2) Determine the eligibility of applicants and the selection
procedures. The department must require as a condition of
eligibility that an applicant must complete annual defensive
driving training courses.
(3) Determine whether the equipment or service for which an
applicant seeks a grant fulfills the purposes of this chapter.
(4) Determine the amount of a grant awarded to a recipient.
2026 IN 1167—LS 6740/DI 87


Sec. 11. (a) The digital alert pilot program grant fund is
established for the purpose of funding grants to successful
applicants.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The fund shall consist of the following:
(1) Appropriations to the fund.
(2) Federal funds available for the purposes of the fund and
the pilot program.
(3) Gifts or donations to the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 12. The secretary and the executive director of the Indiana
criminal justice institute shall, not later than September 1, 2026,
provide a plan to the department for leveraging available federal
funds to fund the pilot program, including preventing roadside
deaths grants under 23 U.S.C. 405, that are provided under the
National Highway Transportation Safety Administration's
National Priority Safety Programs.
Sec. 13. This chapter expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 1167—LS 6740/DI 87